Maryland, session 2025, SB0822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0822*

SENATE BILL 822
(4) “HOMEOWNER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL
INTEREST IN A NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE OR WHO IS AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF AN
AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY THAT HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN A
NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE.
(5) “LEGAL INTEREST” MEANS AN INTEREST IN A NONPRIMARY
RESIDENCE:
(I) AS A SOLE OWNER;
(II) AS A JOINT TENANT;
(III) AS A TENANT IN COMMON;
(IV) AS A TENANT BY THE ENTIRETIES;
(V) THROUGH MEMBERSHIP IN A COOPERATIVE;
(VI) UNDER A LAND INSTALLMENT CONTRACT, AS DEFINED IN §
10–101 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(VII) AS A HOLDER OF A LIFE ESTATE; OR
(VIII) AS A SETTLOR, GRANTOR, OR BENEFICIARY OF A TRUST IF:
1. THE SETTLOR, GRANTOR, OR BENEFICIARY OF THE
TRUST DOES NOT PAY RENT OR OTHER REMUNERATION TO RESIDE IN THE
NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE; AND
2. LEGAL TITLE TO THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE IS
HELD IN THE NAME OF THE TRUST OR IN THE NAMES OF THE TRUSTEES FOR THE
TRUST.
(6) (I) “NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE” MEANS:
1. A HOUSE:
A. THAT IS NOT USED AS THE PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE OF
THE HOMEOWNER;
B. THAT IS ACTUALLY OCCUPIED OR EXPECTED TO BE
ACTUALLY OCCUPIED BY THE HOMEOWNER FOR FEWER THAN 6 MONTHS OF A

SENATE BILL 822 3
12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING WITH THE DATE OF FINALITY FOR THE TAXABLE
YEAR FOR WHICH THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IS SOUGHT; AND
C. FOR WHICH THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER §
9–105 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS NOT APPLICABLE; AND
2. THE LOT OR CURTILAGE ON WHICH THE HOUSE IS
ERECTED.
(II) “NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE” INCLUDES:
1. A CONDOMINIUM UNIT THAT IS OCCUPIED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN THE CONDOMINIUM;
2. AN APARTMENT IN A COOPERATIVE APARTMENT
CORPORATION THAT IS OCCUPIED BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL INTEREST
IN THE APARTMENT; AND
3. A PART OF REAL PROPERTY USED OTHER THAN
PRIMARILY FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, IF THE REAL PROPERTY IS USED AS A
PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN THE REAL
PROPERTY.
(III) “NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE” DOES NOT INCLUDE
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS HELD BY THE OWNER PRIMARILY FOR
RENTAL, INVESTMENT, OR THE GENERATION OF INCOME.
(7) “TAXABLE ASSESSMENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–105
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IF THERE IS AN INCREASE IN PROPERTY ASSESSMENT AS
CALCULATED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE STATE AND THE GOVERNING BODY OF
EACH COUNTY AND OF EACH MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL GRANT A PROPERTY
TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE STATE, COUNTY, AND MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON A NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE OF A
HOMEOWNER BY THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(2) A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
BE APPLICABLE TO ANY STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY
TAX AND ANY PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED FOR A BICOUNTY COMMISSION.
(C) (1) IF A NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE IS NOT USED PRIMARILY FOR
RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPORTION THE TOTAL

SENATE BILL 822
PROPERTY ASSESSMENT BETWEEN THE PART OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE
THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES AND THE PART OF THE NONPRIMARY
RESIDENCE THAT IS NOT USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES.
(2) (I) FOR A HOMEOWNER WHO IS AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF AN
AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY TO QUALIFY FOR THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
UNDER THIS SECTION:
1. THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE MUST HAVE BEEN
OWNED AND OCCUPIED BY THE ACTIVE MEMBER:
A. AT THE TIME OF ITS TRANSFER TO THE
AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY; OR
B. IF THE AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY IS A
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY AND THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS ORIGINALLY
TRANSFERRED TO THE AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY AS PART OF A
CONVERSION FROM A PARTNERSHIP UNDER § 4A–211 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND
ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE, THEN AT THE TIME OF ITS TRANSFER TO THE FORMER
PARTNERSHIP; AND
2. THE AGRICULTURAL OWNERSHIP ENTITY AND THE
ACTIVE MEMBER WHO OCCUPIES THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE MUST FILE AN
APPLICATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHING INITIAL ELIGIBILITY FOR
THE CREDIT ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30 FOR THE FOLLOWING TAXABLE YEAR AND, AT
THE REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, MUST FILE AN APPLICATION IN ANY FUTURE
YEAR TO VERIFY CONTINUED ELIGIBILITY.
(II) FAILURE TO FILE A TIMELY APPLICATION MAY RESULT IN
DISQUALIFICATION FROM THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
FOR THE FOLLOWING TAXABLE YEAR.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AUTHORIZE AND THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL GRANT A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR A NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE FOR A TAXABLE YEAR UNLESS DURING
THE PREVIOUS TAXABLE YEAR:
(I) THE HOMEOWNER OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE DID
NOT ALSO MAINTAIN AND RESIDE IN A DWELLING, AS DEFINED UNDER § 9–105 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, IN THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 822 5
(II) THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS TRANSFERRED FOR
CONSIDERATION TO NEW OWNERSHIP;
(III) THE VALUE OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS
INCREASED DUE TO A CHANGE IN THE ZONING CLASSIFICATION OF THE
NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE INITIATED OR REQUESTED BY THE HOMEOWNER OR
ANYONE HAVING AN INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY;
(IV) THE USE OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS CHANGED
SUBSTANTIALLY; OR
(V) THE ASSESSMENT OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS
CLEARLY ERRONEOUS DUE TO AN ERROR IN CALCULATION OR MEASUREMENT OF
IMPROVEMENTS ON THE REAL PROPERTY.
(2) A HOMEOWNER MUST ACTUALLY RESIDE IN THE NONPRIMARY
RESIDENCE BY JULY 1 OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IS TO BE ALLOWED.
(3) THE CREDIT MAY BE GRANTED ONLY TO ONE NONPRIMARY
RESIDENCE OWNED BY THE HOMEOWNER.
(4) IF A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IS LESS THAN
$1 IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE TAX CREDIT MAY NOT BE GRANTED.
(5) (I) IF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE WAS TRANSFERRED FOR
CONSIDERATION IN A DEED DATED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1 BUT BEFORE THE
BEGINNING OF THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR AND THE DEED WAS RECORDED WITH THE
CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT OR THE DEPARTMENT ON OR AFTER JULY 1 BUT
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 OF THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR, THE NEW OWNER MAY SUBMIT
A WRITTEN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 OF
THE SECOND TAXABLE YEAR FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE DEED REQUESTING
THAT THE DATE OF THE DEED BE ACCEPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS THE DATE OF
TRANSFER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) 1. THE APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT WITH THE WRITTEN
APPLICATION A COPY OF THE EXECUTED DEED EVIDENCING THE DATE OF THE
TRANSFER.
2. IF THE APPLICANT FAILS TO SUBMIT A COPY OF THE
EXECUTED DEED AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DENY THE APPLICATION.

SENATE BILL 822
(III) THE DATE OF THE TRANSFER UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IS
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE DEED AS DESCRIBED UNDER § 3–201 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(IV) IF A HOMEOWNER SUBMITS AN ELIGIBLE APPLICATION
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AFTER MAY 1 OF THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR FOLLOWING
THE DATE OF THE DEED AND THE HOMEOWNER IS DUE TO RECEIVE A REDUCTION IN
THE HOMEOWNER’S PROPERTY TAX BILL IN THE SECOND TAXABLE YEAR
FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE DEED AS A RESULT OF THE CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION, PROPERTY TAX IS NOT DUE ON THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE FOR THE
SECOND TAXABLE YEAR FOLLOWING THE DATE OF THE DEED UNTIL 30 DAYS AFTER
A REVISED TAX BILL IS SENT TO THE HOMEOWNER.
(6) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO QUALIFY FOR THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION, A HOMEOWNER
SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR THE CREDIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AS
PROVIDED IN THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) THE APPLICATION SHALL:
1. BE MADE ON THE FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT
PROVIDES;
2. PROVIDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
FORM;
3. INCLUDE A STATEMENT BY THE HOMEOWNER UNDER
OATH THAT THE FACTS STATED IN THE APPLICATION ARE TRUE, CORRECT, AND
COMPLETE; AND
4. BE FILED ON OR BEFORE THE MAY 1 PRECEDING THE
FIRST TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION
IS TO BE ALLOWED.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A HOMEOWNER THE
OPTION TO SUBMIT THE APPLICATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH
ELECTRONICALLY ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(7) IF A HOMEOWNER SUBMITS AN APPLICATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT
THE HOMEOWNER WAS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT IN THE PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR BUT
FAILED TO FILE AN APPLICATION FOR THE CREDIT AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION:

SENATE BILL 822 7
(I) THE HOMEOWNER SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY QUALIFIED
FOR THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT PROGRAM FOR THE
PRIOR TAXABLE YEAR; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CALCULATE THE PRIOR YEAR’S
TAXABLE ASSESSMENT AS IF THE CREDIT HAD BEEN GRANTED FOR THE PRIOR
TAXABLE YEAR.
(E) (1) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION IS CALCULATED BY:
(I) MULTIPLYING THE PRIOR YEAR’S TAXABLE ASSESSMENT BY
THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE PROVIDED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) SUBTRACTING THAT AMOUNT FROM THE CURRENT YEAR’S
ASSESSMENT; AND
(III) IF THE DIFFERENCE IS A POSITIVE NUMBER, MULTIPLYING
THE DIFFERENCE BY THE APPLICABLE PROPERTY TAX RATE FOR THE CURRENT
YEAR.
(2) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR, THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT
PERCENTAGE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS:
(I) FOR THE STATE PROPERTY TAX AND FOR ANY PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED FOR A BICOUNTY COMMISSION, 115%;
(II) FOR THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX:
1. THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE
ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
2. IF THE COUNTY HAS NOT SET A PERCENTAGE FOR THE
TAXABLE YEAR UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR HAS NOT NOTIFIED
THE DEPARTMENT AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
CREDIT PERCENTAGE IN EFFECT FOR THE COUNTY FOR THE PRECEDING TAXABLE
YEAR; AND
(III) FOR THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX:

SENATE BILL 822
1. THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE
ESTABLISHED BY THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; OR
2. IF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION HAS NOT SET A
PERCENTAGE UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR HAS NOT NOTIFIED
THE DEPARTMENT AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR THE
COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(3) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAYOR
AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY AND THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY
ON OR BEFORE MARCH 15 OF ANY YEAR SHALL SET, BY LAW, THE NONPRIMARY
RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING THE
FOLLOWING JULY 1.
(4) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE MARCH 25 OF ANY YEAR, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION MAY SET OR ALTER, BY LAW, A NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT
PERCENTAGE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING THE FOLLOWING JULY 1 AND ANY
SUBSEQUENT TAXABLE YEAR.
(5) THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE CREDIT PERCENTAGE FOR ANY
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX:
(I) MAY NOT BE LESS THAN 100% OR EXCEED 115% FOR ANY
TAXABLE YEAR; AND
(II) SHALL BE EXPRESSED IN INCREMENTS OF 1 PERCENTAGE
POINT.
(6) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY AND THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ANY ACTION
TAKEN UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON OR BEFORE MARCH 15
PRECEDING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE ACTION IS TAKEN.
(7) A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT
OF ANY ACTION TAKEN UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON OR BEFORE
MARCH 25 PRECEDING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE ACTION IS TAKEN.
(F) A HOMEOWNER WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE GRANTED THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE
STATE, COUNTY, AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX AND ANY

SENATE BILL 822 9
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED FOR A BICOUNTY COMMISSION IMPOSED ON THE REAL
PROPERTY OF THE NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE.
(G) THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE INCLUDED ON THE
HOMEOWNER’S PROPERTY TAX BILL.
(H) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL:
(1) COOPERATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT IN ADOPTING A PROCEDURE
TO AUDIT THE APPLICATION FORMS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING § 13–202 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE,
PROVIDE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(3) ASSIST THE DEPARTMENT IN A POSTAUDIT OF EACH
APPLICATION.
(I) THE COUNTIES SHALL REIMBURSE THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE APPLICATION PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(6) OF
THIS SECTION.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(K) THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE
NONPRIMARY RESIDENCE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.